belarusian.aff
# Belarusian affix file and dictionaries
# Version number: 0.52
# Copyright: Mikalai Udodau (C) 2012
# License: Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike
# See http://creativecommons.org/licenses/by-sa/3.0/

nroffchars	().\\*
texchars	()\[]{}<\>\\$*.%

defstringtype "list" "nroff" ".list" ".txt" ".man"

boundarychars [\-]

# compoundwords on

wordchars [àÿî¸éöóêæåıíãø¢çõ³ûïğëäşüáâòìñ÷ô] [ÀßÎ¨ÉÖÓÊÆÅİÍÃØ¡ÇÕ²ÛÏĞËÄŞÜÁÂÒÌÑ×Ô]
wordchars [¸] [¨]
wordchars [¢] [¡]
wordchars [³] [²]
wordchars [\']

# SET microsoft-cp1251

prefixes

flag A:
   ¡       > -¡,Ó
   [^¡]    > ÍÅ


suffixes

# Íàçî¢í³ê³

# Æàíî÷û ğîä, àäç. ë³ê; êàí÷àòê³ òâ. ñêë. çàëåæàöü àä íàö³ñêó
flag *B:
   [ÁÂÄÆ] À    > -À,Û    #  >  &_c.gen. 
   [ÇËÌÍ] À    > -À,Û    #  >  &_c.gen. 
   [ÏĞÑÒ] À    > -À,Û    #  >  &_c.gen. 
   [ÔÖ×Ø] À    > -À,Û    #  >  &_c.gen. 
   [ÃÊÕ] À    > -À,²     #  >  &_c.gen.
   [ÁÂÇË] À    > -À,Å    # > &_c.dat.
   [ÌÍÏÑ] À    > -À,Å    # > &_c.dat.
   [Ô] À    > -À,Å       # > &_c.dat.
   Ã À    > -ÃÀ,ÇÅ         # ïóãà > ïóçå &_c.dat.
   Ä À    > -ÄÀ,ÄÇÅ         #  >  &_c.dat.
   Ê À    > -ÊÀ,ÖÛ         # ãîğêà > ãîğöû &_c.dat.
   Ò À    > -ÒÀ,ÖÅ         # ³ñòîòà > ³ñòîöå &_c.dat.
   Õ À    > -ÕÀ,ÑÅ         #  >  &_c.dat.
   À    > -À,Ó           # ğóæà > ğóæó &_c.acc.
   À    > -À,ÀÉ          #  >  &_c.ins.
   À    > -À,ÀŞ          #  >  &_c.ins.
   ß    > -ß,²           #  >  &_c.gen.
   ß    > -ß,Ş           #  >  &_c.acc.
   ß    > -ß,ßÉ          #  >  &_c.ins.
   ß    > -ß,ßŞ          #  >  &_c.ins.
   [ÁÔ]    > ²           # ãëûá > ãëûá³ &_c.gen.
   [ÆĞ×Ø]    > Û         #  >  &_c.gen.
   [Ö]    > Û            # ìîö > ìîöû &_c.gen.
   [ÇËÍÑ] Ü    > -Ü,²     # ğûñü > ğûñ³ &_c.gen.
   [Ö] Ü    > -Ü,²        #  >  &_c.gen.
   Ä Ç Ü    > -ÄÇÜ,ÄÄÇŞ        # ìîëàäçü > ìîëàääçş &_c.ins.
   [ÀÅ¨²] Ç Ü    > -ÇÜ,ÇÇŞ   # ìàçü > ìàççş &_c.ins.
   [ÎÓÛİ] Ç Ü    > -ÇÜ,ÇÇŞ   #  >  &_c.ins.
   [Şß] Ç Ü    > -ÇÜ,ÇÇŞ     #  >  &_c.ins.
   Ë Ü    > -ËÜ,ËËŞ         # ñîëü > ñîëëş &_c.ins.
   Í Ü    > -ÍÜ,ÍÍŞ         #  >  &_c.ins.
   Ñ Ü    > -ÑÜ,ÑÑŞ         #  >  &_c.ins.
   [ÀÅ¨²] Ö Ü    > -ÖÜ,ÖÖŞ   #  >  &_c.ins.
   [ÎÓÛİ] Ö Ü    > -ÖÜ,ÖÖŞ   #  >  &_c.ins.
   [Şß] Ö Ü    > -ÖÜ,ÖÖŞ     # ïàìÿöü > ïàìÿööş &_c.ins.
   [ĞÑ¡] Ö Ü    > -ÖÜ,ÖŞ    # êîñöü > êîñöş &_c.ins.
   Æ    > -Æ,ÆÆÓ          # áåçäàğàæ > áåçäàğàææó &_c.ins.
   Ø    > -Ø,ØØÓ          # ìûø > ìûøøó &_c.ins.
   ×    > -×,××Ó          # íî÷ > íî÷÷ó &_c.ins.
   [¡]    > Ş          # êğî¢ > êğî¢ş &_c.ins.
   [ÁĞÔ]    > 'Ş       # øûğ > øûğ'ş &_c.ins.

flag *C:
   [ÁÂÄÆ] À    > -À,Û    #  >  &_c.gen. 
   [ÇËÌÍ] À    > -À,Û    # ñöÿíà > ñöÿíû &_c.gen. 
   [ÏĞÑÒ] À    > -À,Û    #  >  &_c.gen. 
   [ÔÖ×Ø] À    > -À,Û    #  >  &_c.gen. 
   [ÃÊÕ] À    > -À,²     # ñìóãà > ñìóã³ &_c.gen.
   [ÁÂÇË] À    > -À,Å    # > &_c.dat.
   [ÌÍÏÑ] À    > -À,Å    # > &_c.dat.
   [Ô] À    > -À,Å       # > &_c.dat.
   Ã À    > -ÃÀ,ÇÅ         #  >  &_c.dat.
   Ä À    > -ÄÀ,ÄÇÅ         # âàäà > âàäçå &_c.dat.
   Ê À    > -ÊÀ,Öİ         # ğóêà > ğóöı &_c.dat.
   Ò À    > -ÒÀ,ÖÅ         #  >  &_c.dat.
   Õ À    > -ÕÀ,ÑÅ         # ñòğàõà > ñòğàñå &_c.dat.
   À    > -À,Ó          #  >  &_c.acc.
   À    > -À,ÎÉ          #  >  &_c.ins.
   À    > -À,ÎŞ          #  >  &_c.ins.
   ß    > -ß,²          # çÿìëÿ > çÿìë³ &_c.gen.
   ß    > -ß,Ş          #  >  &_c.acc.
   ß    > -ß,¨É          #  >  &_c.ins.
   ß    > -ß,¨Ş          #  >  &_c.ins.

# æ.ğ., ìíîæíû ë³ê
flag *D:
   [ÁÂÄÆ] À    > -À,Û    #  >  &_c.nom._plur.
   [ÇËÌÍ] À    > -À,Û    #  >  &_c.nom._plur.
   [ÏĞÑÒ] À    > -À,Û    #  >  &_c.nom._plur.
   [ÔÖ×Ø] À    > -À,Û    #  >  &_c.nom._plur.
   [ÃÊÕ] À     > -À,²     # ìóõà > ìóõ³ &_c.nom._plur.
   [ÁÄÆÇ] À    > -À,-    # àñîáà > àñîá &_c.gen._plur.
   [ËÌÍÏ] À    > -À,-    #  >  &_c.gen._plur.
   [ĞÑÒÔ] À    > -À,-    #  >  &_c.gen._plur.
   [ÕÖ×Ø] À    > -À,-    #  >  &_c.gen._plur.
   Â À    > -ÂÀ,¡         # ìîâà > ìî¢ &_c.gen._plur.
   [ÁÄÆÇ] Ã À    > -ÃÀ,ÀÃ   # ğîçãà > ğîçàã &_c.gen._plur.
   [ËÌÍÏ] Ã À    > -ÃÀ,ÀÃ   #  >  &_c.gen._plur.
   [ĞÑÒÔ] Ã À    > -ÃÀ,ÀÃ   #  >  &_c.gen._plur.
   [Ö×Ø] Ã À    > -ÃÀ,ÀÃ    #  >  &_c.gen._plur.
   [ÀÅ¨²] Ã À    > -ÃÀ,Ã   # çà¢âàãà > çà¢âàã &_c.gen._plur.
   [ÎÓÛ] Ã À    > -ÃÀ,Ã    #  >  &_c.gen._plur.
   [İŞß] Ã À    > -ÃÀ,Ã    #  >  &_c.gen._plur.
   [ÁÄÆÇ] Ê À    > -ÊÀ,ÀÊ   #  >  &_c.gen._plur.
   [ËÌÍÏ] Ê À    > -ÊÀ,ÀÊ   #  >  &_c.gen._plur.
   [ĞÑÒÔ] Ê À    > -ÊÀ,ÀÊ   # í³òêà > í³òàê &_c.gen._plur.
   [Ö×Ø] Ê À    > -ÊÀ,ÀÊ    #  >  &_c.gen._plur.
   É Ê À    > -ÉÊÀ,ÅÊ        # ñîéêà > ñîåê &_c.gen._plur.
   ¡ Ê À    > -¡ÊÀ,ÂÀÊ        # ëà¢êà > ëàâàê &_c.gen._plur.
   Ü Ê À    > -ÜÊÀ,ÅÊ        # áóòıëüêà > áóòıëåê &_c.gen._plur.
   [ÀÅ¨²] Ê À    > -ÊÀ,Ê   #  >  &_c.gen._plur.
   [ÎÓÛ] Ê À    > -ÊÀ,Ê    # ğóêà > ğóê &_c.gen._plur.
   [İŞß] Ê À    > -ÊÀ,Ê    #  >  &_c.gen._plur.
   À    > -À,ÀÌ          #  >  &_c.dat._plur.
   À    > -À,ÀÌ²          #  >  &_c.ins._plur.
   À    > -À,ÀÕ          #  >  &_c.pr._plur.
   [ÀÅ¨²] ß    > -ß,É    # àğì³ÿ > àğì³é &_c.gen._plur.
   [ÎÓÛ] ß    > -ß,É     #  >  &_c.gen._plur.
   [İŞß] ß    > -ß,É     #  >  &_c.gen._plur.
   [ÀÅ¨²] Ë ß    > -Ëß,ËÜ   # íÿäçåëÿ > íÿäçåëü &_c.gen._plur.
   [ÎÓÛ] Ë ß    > -Ëß,ËÜ    #  >  &_c.gen._plur.
   [İŞß] Ë ß    > -Ëß,ËÜ    #  >  &_c.gen._plur.
   [ÁÌÏÔ] Ë ß    > -Ëß,ÅËÜ   # êğîïëÿ > êğîïåëü &_c.gen._plur.
   [ÀÅ¨²] Í ß    > -Íß,ÍÜ   #  >  &_c.gen._plur.
   [ÎÓÛ] Í ß    > -Íß,ÍÜ    # âÿğøûíÿ > âÿğøûíü &_c.gen._plur.
   [İŞß] Í ß    > -Íß,ÍÜ    #  >  &_c.gen._plur.
   É Í ß    > -ÉÍß,ÅÍÜ        # áîéíÿ > áîåíü &_c.gen._plur.
   [ĞÕØ] Í ß    > -Íß,ÀÍÜ    # â³øíÿ > â³øàíü &_c.gen._plur.
   [Ñ] Í ß    > -Íß,ÅÍÜ      # ïåñíÿ > ïåñåíü &_c.gen._plur.
   ¡ Í ß    > -¡Íß,ÂÅÍÜ        # æàğî¢íÿ > æàğîâåíü &_c.gen._plur.
   ß    > -ß,ßÌ          #  >  &_c.dat._plur.
   ß    > -ß,ßÌ²          #  >  &_c.ins._plur.
   ß    > -ß,ßÕ          #  >  &_c.pr._plur.
   ²    > -²,É          # çìå³ > çìåé &_c.gen._plur.
   ²    > -²,ßÌ          #  >  &_c.dat._plur.
   ²    > -²,ßÌ²          #  >  &_c.ins._plur.
   ²    > -²,ßÕ          #  >  &_c.pr._plur.
   [ÁÔ]    > ²         # âåğô > âåğô³ &_c.nom.plur.
   [ÁÔ]    > ÅÉ        #  >  &_c.gen.plur.
   [ÁÔ]    > ßÌ        #  >  &_c.dat.plur.
   [ÁÔ]    > ßÌ²       #  >  &_c.ins.plur.
   [ÁÔ]    > ßÕ        #  >  &_c.pr.plur.
   [ÆĞÖ×]    > Û       #  >  &_c.nom.plur.
   [ÆĞÖ×]    > İÉ      #  >  &_c.gen.plur.
   [ÆĞÖ×]    > ÀÌ      #  >  &_c.dat.plur.
   [ÆĞÖ×]    > ÀÌ²     #  >  &_c.ins.plur.
   [ÆĞÖ×]    > ÀÕ      #  >  &_c.pr.plur.
   [Ø]    > Û          # ìûø > ìûøû &_c.nom.plur.
   [Ø]    > İÉ         #  >  &_c.gen.plur.
   [Ø]    > ÀÌ         #  >  &_c.dat.plur.
   [Ø]    > ÀÌ²        #  >  &_c.ins.plur.
   [Ø]    > ÀÕ         #  >  &_c.pr.plur.
   Ü    > -Ü,ÅÉ          # ñóïîëüíàñöü > ñóïîëüíàñöåé &_c.gen.plur.
   Ü    > -Ü,ßÌ          #  >  &_c.dat._plur.
   Ü    > -Ü,ßÌ²          #  >  &_c.ins._plur.
   Ü    > -Ü,ßÕ          #  >  &_c.pr._plur.
   Å É    > -ÅÉ,ßÌ         # êàñöåé > êàñöÿì &_c.dat.plur.
   Å É    > -ÅÉ,ßÌ²         #  >  &_c.ins.plur.
   Å É    > -ÅÉ,ßÕ         #  >  &_c.pr.plur.
   İ É    > -İÉ,ÀÌ         # íà÷ıé > íà÷àì &_c.dat.plur.
   İ É    > -İÉ,ÀÌ²         #  >  &_c.ins.plur.
   İ É    > -İÉ,ÀÕ         #  >  &_c.pr.plur.

# Ìíîæíû ë³ê íàçî¢í³êà¢ ñà çáåãàì çû÷íûõ ó àñíîâå,
# ç ÷àğãàâàííåì ãàëîñíàé êîğàíş, ö³ ìàşöü òîëüê³ ìí.ë.
flag *E:
   [ÃÕ] ²    > -²,-      # ñòğıõ³ > ñòğıõ &_c.gen._plur.
   [ÀÅ¨²] Ê ²    > -Ê²,Ê   # ğàêà - ğıê³ > ğıê &_c.gen._plur.
   [ÎÓÛ] Ê ²    > -Ê²,Ê    #  >  &_c.gen._plur.
   [ÛİŞ] Ê ²    > -Ê²,Ê    #  >  &_c.gen._plur.
   É Ê ²    > -ÉÊ²,ÅÊ        #  >  &_c.gen._plur.
   ¡ Ê ²    > -¡Ê²,ÂÀÊ        # âûñå¢ê³ > âûñåâàê &_c.gen._plur.
   Ü Ê ²    > -ÜÊ²,ÅÊ        # ãğàáåëüê³ > ãğàáåëåê &_c.gen._plur.
   [ÁÃÄÆ] Ê ²    > -Ê²,ÀÊ   #  >  &_c.gen._plur.
   [ÇËÌÍ] Ê ²    > -Ê²,ÀÊ   #  >  &_c.gen._plur.
   [ÏĞÑÒ] Ê ²    > -Ê²,ÀÊ   # ñóòê³ > ñóòàê &_c.gen._plur.
   [ÔÕÖ×] Ê ²    > -Ê²,ÀÊ   #  >  &_c.gen._plur.
   [Ø] Ê ²    > -Ê²,ÀÊ      #  >  &_c.gen._plur.
   [ÁÄÆÇ] Û    > -Û,-    # ìåæû > ìåæ &_c.gen._plur.
   [ËÌÍÏ] Û    > -Û,-   # ìåæû > ìåæ &_c.gen._plur.
   [ĞÑÒÔ] Û    > -Û,-    # ìåæû > ìåæ &_c.gen._plur.
   [Ö×Ø] Û    > -Û,-     # ìåæû > ìåæ &_c.gen._plur.
   Â Û    > -ÂÛ,¡         # ãàëîâû > ãàëî¢ &_c.gen._plur.
   Å    > -Å,-          # äàò÷àíå > äàò÷àí &_c.gen._plur.
   Å    > -Å,ÀÌ          # ğûìëÿíå > ğûìëÿíàì &_c.dat._plur.
   Å    > -Å,ÀÌ²          #  >  &_c.ins._plur.
   Å    > -Å,ÀÕ          #  >  &_c.pr._plur.
   [ÃÊÕ] ²    > -²,ÀÌ     #  >  &_c.dat._plur.
   [ÃÊÕ] ²    > -²,ÀÌ²     #  >  &_c.ins._plur.
   [ÃÊÕ] ²    > -²,ÀÕ     #  >  &_c.pr._plur.
   Û    > -Û,ÀÌ          #  >  &_c.dat._plur.
   Û    > -Û,ÀÌ²          #  >  &_c.ins._plur.
   Û    > -Û,ÀÕ          #  >  &_c.pr._plur.
   À    > -À,İÉ          # áàõ÷à > áàõ÷ıé &_c.gen.plur.
   À    > -À,ÀÌ          #  >  &_c.dat._plur.
   À    > -À,ÀÌ²          #  >  &_c.ins._plur.
   À    > -À,ÀÕ          #  >  &_c.pr._plur.
   ß    > -ß,ÅÉ          # ëàääçÿ > ëàääçåé &_c.gen.plur.
   ß    > -ß,ßÌ          #  >  &_c.dat._plur.
   ß    > -ß,ßÌ²          #  >  &_c.ins._plur.
   ß    > -ß,ßÕ          #  >  &_c.pr._plur.

# Ïåğøàå ñêëàíåííå, ìóæ÷ûíñê³ ³ í³ÿê³ ğîä
# êàí÷àòàê ğ. ñêë. àäç. ë., íåçàëåæíà àä õàğàêòàğó àñíîâû,
# ìîæà áûöü -à (-ÿ) ö³ -ó (-ş);
# "-ó" ñóïàäàå ç òâîğíûì ñêëîíàì, "-à" âûâîäç³ì àñîáíà:
flag *F:
   [ÁÂÃÄ]    > À     # ãàä > ãàäà &_c.gen.
   [ÆÇËÌ]    > À     #  >  &_c.gen.
   [ÍÏĞÑ]    > À     #  >  &_c.gen.
   [ÒÔÕ×]    > À     #  >  &_c.gen.
   [Ø]    > À        #  >  &_c.gen.
   [ÃÊÕ] À    > -À,²     # ñàáàêà > ñàáàê³ &_c.gen.
   [ÂÄÇË] À    > -À,Û    #  >  &_c.gen.
   [ÍĞÒÖ] À    > -À,Û    # Ñêàğûíà > Ñêàğûíû &_c.gen.
   [Ø] À    > -À,Û       #  >  &_c.gen.
   Å    > -Å,ß          # ïîëå > ïîëÿ &_c.gen.
   ¨    > -¨,ß          # æûöö¸ > æûööÿ &_c.gen.
   É    > -É,ß          #  >  &_c.gen.
   [Å²ÉÍ] Ê    > -Ê,ÊÀ    # äğàí³ê > äğàí³êà &_c.gen.
   [ĞÑÓ¡] Ê    > -Ê,ÊÀ    #  >  &_c.gen.
   [ÖÛİŞ] Ê    > -Ê,ÊÀ    #  >  &_c.gen.
   [ß] Ê    > -Ê,ÊÀ       #  >  &_c.gen.
   [ÁÄÆÇ] À Ê    > -ÀÊ,ÊÀ   #  >  &_c.gen.
   [ËÌÍÏ] À Ê    > -ÀÊ,ÊÀ   #  >  &_c.gen.
   [ĞÑÒ×] À Ê    > -ÀÊ,ÊÀ 
  # êàí÷àòàê > êàí÷àòêà &_c.gen.
   [Ø] À Ê    > -ÀÊ,ÊÀ      #  >  &_c.gen.
   Â À Ê    > -ÂÀÊ,¡ÊÀ        # àëîâàê > àëî¢êà &_c.gen.
   ¨ Ê    > -¨Ê,ÜÊÀ         # êàí¸ê > êàíüêà &_c.gen.
   [ÁÄÆÇ] Î Ê    > -ÎÊ,ÊÀ   # äóáîê > äóáêà &_c.gen.
   [ËÌÍÏ] Î Ê    > -ÎÊ,ÊÀ   #  >  &_c.gen.
   [ĞÑÒ×] Î Ê    > -ÎÊ,ÊÀ   #  >  &_c.gen.
   [Ø] Î Ê    > -ÎÊ,ÊÀ      #  >  &_c.gen.
   Â Î Ê    > -ÂÎÊ,¡ÊÀ        # ğûâîê > ğû¢êà &_c.gen.
   Î    > -Î,À          # äàáğî > äàáğà &_c.gen.
   ¡    > -¡,ÂÀ          # êààïåğàòû¢ > êààïåğàòûâà &_c.gen.
   [À²Ğ] Ö    > -Ö,ÖÀ     #  >  &_c.gen.
   [ÛÜß] Ö    > -Ö,ÖÀ     # ìåñÿö > ìåñÿöà &_c.gen.
   [ÁÇÌÍ] Å Ö    > -ÅÖ,ÖÀ   # êàíåö > êàíöà &_c.gen.
   [ÏÑÔ] Å Ö    > -ÅÖ,ÖÀ    #  >  &_c.gen.
   Â Å Ö    > -ÂÅÖ,¡ÖÀ        # âàéñêîâåö > âàéñêî¢öà &_c.gen.
   Ë Å Ö    > -ËÅÖ,ËÜÖÀ        # â³äıëåö > â³äıëüöà &_c.gen.
   Ü    > -Ü,ß          # àëåíü > àëåíÿ &_c.gen.
   ß    > -ß,²          # Áÿäóëÿ > Áÿäóë³ &_c.gen.
